src/abbr-fin-lex.txt
! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !

! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

LEXICON Abbreviation
        ITRAB ;     
        TRNUMAB ;
        TRAB ;  

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
ab-nodot ;
ab-dot ;

! Some of these POS
!LEXICON ab-noun-adj
! ab-noun ;
! ab-adj ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun-adj
 ab-dot-noun ;
 ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-noun
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

LEXICON ab-adj
ab-nodot-adj ;
ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-adv
ab-nodot-adv ;
ab-dot-adv ;

LEXICON ab-num
ab-nodot-num ;
ab-dot-num;

!still not in use.
!LEXICON ab-cc
!ab-nodot-cc ;
!ab-dot-cc ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk 
 +ABBR+N: abbrcase ;

LEXICON abbrcase
 +Attr: # ;    ! no period, that is. 
 +Nom: # ;     ! no period, that is.
 +Acc:n # ;     ! no period, that is.
 +Gen:n # ;     ! no period, that is.
 +Ill:%:iin # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +Ine:%:ss%^A # ;  ! no period, that is
 +Ela:%:st%^A # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +Com:%:ine # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Ess:%:n%^A # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +All:%:lle # ; ! no period, that is. !SUB
 +Ade:%:ll%^A # ; ! no period, that is. !SUB
 +Abl:%:lt%^A # ;! no period, that is. !SUB
 +Tra:%:ksi # ; ! no period, that is. !SUB

LEXICON ab-nodot-adj
 +ABBR+A: abbrcase ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv
 +ABBR+Adv: # ;
 
  LEXICON ab-nodot-num
 +ABBR+Num: abbrcase ;


LEXICON ab-nodot      ! default
 +ABBR+N: abbrcase ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot        ! Default
 +ABBR:%. abbrcase ;  

LEXICON ab-dot-noun   ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 +ABBR+N:%. # ;  

! The idea is that the nominal ones may have case, like e.g. P.E.N. 

LEXICON ab-dot-adj ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 +ABBR+A:%. abbrcase ;  
 
LEXICON ab-dot-adv     ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
  +ABBR+Adv:%. # ;     ! Adv without case.
 
LEXICON ab-dot-num     ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 +ABBR+Num:%. abbrcase ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-cc
 +ABBR+CC:%. # ;  


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

LEXICON ab-verb ! A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
 ab-dot-verb ;
 ab-nodot-verb ;

LEXICON ab-dot-verb
 +ABBR+V:%.   # ; ! Period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-verb 
 +ABBR+V:    # ; ! No period.
 
 

  
! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------



! =============================================== !
!            Intransitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON TRNUMAB
! For abbrs for which numerals are complements, but other
! words not necessarily are. This group treats arabic numerals as
! if it were transitive but letters as if it were intransitive.
! TODO: Bug the fact that these abbrs do not distinguish between
! cap and small letters, whereast he ITRAB ones do.



Apd		ab-dot ;                                      !
bie		ab-dot ;
Bnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
Dnr		ab-noun ;
Enr		ab-noun ;
Pb              ab-noun ; ! Postbox 
Rg		ab-nodot ;
Rt		ab-dot ;                                      !
S.nr		ab-noun ;                                 !
Kor		ab-noun ;
Tess		ab-noun ;
O.nr		ab-noun ;                                 !
alm		ab-dot ;                                      !
anr		ab-noun ;
bet		ab-dot-noun ;
b.c		ab-dot ;  !b.c. 18-22
bc		ab-dot ;  !bc. 30-42
bnr		ab-noun ;                                 !
ds		ab-dot ;
enr		ab-noun ;
fnr		ab-noun ;
gnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
j		ab-dot ;                                      !
jnr		ab-dot ;                                      !
kap		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
kr		ab ;                                          !
lnr		ab-noun ;
mk		ab-noun ;
mob		ab-noun ;
nr		ab-noun ; ! Nr nicht                          !
org.nr		ab-dot-noun ;
Pk		ab-dot ;
s		ab-noun ;                                     !
!su          ab-dot-adv ;               ! sullii. Gen of "son".
tab:tab3	ab ; ! or: Add capital Tab.               !
vnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !




! =============================================== !
!              Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !
                              

LEXICON ITRAB
2p		ab ;	!^C^                    !
3p		ab ;	!^C^                    !
a		ab ; !adjektiiva           !
abl		ab-noun ;
abstr		ab-adj ;
adess		ab-noun ;
adj		ab-noun ;
adv		ab-noun ;
advl		ab-noun ;
affekt		ab ;
akk		ab-noun ;
akk/gen		ab-noun ;	!^C^
akt		ab ;
all		ab-noun ;
anat		ab-dot-adj ; !anatomalaš    !
att		ab ;
attr		ab ;
bfr		ab-nodot ;                      !
biol		ab-dot-adj ;                !
bot		ab-dot-adj ;                    !
c		ab ;                            !
c/o             ab-nodot ;	!^C^        !
ca		ab-dot ;                        !
cal		ab ;                            !
cg		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
cl		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
cm		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
cos		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
cot		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
d		ab ;                            !
daa		ab-nodot ;                      !
dat		ab-dot-noun ;
dB		ab-nodot ;                      !
ded		ab-dot-noun ;                   !
dg		ab-nodot ;                      !
dl		ab-nodot-noun ;                 !
dm²		ab-nodot-noun ;
dm³		ab-nodot-noun ;
do		ab-dot ;                        !
du		ab-dot-noun ; !dualis
dus		ab-dot ;                        !
e		ab ;                            !
ess		ab-noun ;
etc		ab-dot-adv ;                    !
f		ab ;                            !
f		ab-dot ;                        !
fac		ab ;                            !
ff		ab ;                            !
fin		ab ;
fr		ab ;                            !
g		ab ;                            !
gen		ab-noun ;
geogr		ab-dot-adj ; !geografiijas  !
geom		ab-dot-adj ; !geometrihkala !š
ger		ab-dot ;
gl.rs		ab-dot ;                    !
Gastrolab	ab-dot-noun ; !Org Gastrolaboratoria
GWh		ab-nodot-noun ;
h		ab ;                            !
hg		ab-nodot-noun ;                 !
hl		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
Hz		ab-nodot-noun ;
i		ab ;                            !
ib		ab-nodot ;                      !
ibid	ab-nodot ;                  !
ill		ab-noun ;
imp		ab-noun ;
impf		ab ;
imprt		ab-noun ;
ind		ab-noun ;
indekl		ab-dot ;
inf		ab ;
instr		ab ;
interr		ab-dot-adj ;
intr		ab-dot-adj ;
j.d.s	ab-dot ;                        !
j.s	ab-dot ;                            !
jdd	ab-dot ;                            !
jed		ab-dot ;                        !
jna		ab-adv ; !ja nu ain             !
jnv		ab-adv ;                        !
jur		ab-dot-adj ; !juridihkalaš      !
jv		ab ;                            !
Kbh     ab-nodot-noun ;
kg		ab-nodot-noun ;
kHz		ab-nodot-noun ;                 !
km		ab-nodot-noun ;
km²		ab-nodot-noun ;
km³		ab-nodot-noun ;
kom:kom3		ab ;
komp		ab ;
kond		ab ;
konj		ab ;
konkr		ab-dot-adj; !konkrehta
Kr		ab-noun ;                             !
kV		ab-nodot ;
kvm		ab-nodot ;
kW		ab-nodot-noun ;
kWh		ab-nodot-noun ;
l		ab-noun ;
Lohk		ab-dot ;
lok		ab-dot-noun ; !lokatiiva
m		ab-noun ;
matem		ab-dot-adj ; !matematihkalaš
mg		ab-nodot-noun ;
MHz		ab-nodot-noun ;
milj	ab-num ;
miljo	ab-dot-num ;
mill	ab-num ; !This is used also with dot
mKr	       ab-dot ;
ml	ab-noun ;
mm		ab-nodot-noun ;
mm²		ab-nodot-noun ;
mm³		ab-nodot-noun ;
mrd	ab-num ;
mV	ab-nodot ;
mW	ab-nodot ;
m²		ab-nodot-noun ;
m³		ab-nodot-noun ;
o.Kr	ab-dot-adv ; !Does this exist?
obj		ab-noun ;
od.prp	ab-dot ;
oKr	ab-dot-adv ;
ol	ab-dot-noun ; !ovttaidlohku
pc	ab-noun ; !personal computer
perf	ab-dot ;
pH	ab-nodot-noun ;
phil	ab-dot ;
postp	ab-dot-noun ;
pot		ab-noun ;
pr	ab-dot ;
pres	ab ;
pret		ab ;
prot	ab-dot ;
prt		ab ;
pst	ab ;
pvc	ab-nodot ;
refl	ab-adj ;
rel	ab-dot-noun ;
relat	ab-dot-adj ; !relatiiva
res	ab-dot ;
ru	ab ;
s.v		ab-dot ;
sek		ab-noun ;
sign		ab-noun ;
sl		ab-dot ;
Slalom^vn ab-nodot-noun ;
stip		ab-dot-noun ;
subj		ab-noun ;
subst		ab-noun ;
tan		ab-noun ;   !tangeansa
trans		ab-dot-noun ;
Art	ab-nodot ;
Flf	       ab-nodot ;
FoU	       ab-nodot ;
Gb	       ab-nodot ; !Guovddášbellodat
ImO	       ab-nodot-noun ;
Ji	       ab-nodot-noun ;
LaW	       ab-nodot ;
LuW	       ab-nodot ;
MiF	       ab-nodot ; !Musikk i Finnmark
Med-fak	       ab-nodot-noun ;
NgL    ab-nodot ;
NoKTuRNL	ab-nodot ;      
Norfu		ab-nodot ;
Rp:Rp3        ab-nodot ;
Sf	      ab-nodot-noun ;
SfB	      ab-nodot ;
SfF	      ab-nodot ;
StA	      ab-nodot ;
UiB:UiB3 ab-nodot-noun ;
UiT	 ab-nodot-noun ;
Gwh:Gwh3 ab-nodot ;
LEXICON TRAB                  
Boazod:Boazod3 ab-dot-noun ; !SUB !XXX was ist dás?
adr		ab-dot-noun ;		   !adreassa
Avd.dir ab-dot ;              !Advelingsdirektør
b		ab ; ! trab both in 12. b. 2001 and in "lea miessemánu 30. b. mearidán..."
Bj		ab-dot ;              !Bjørn, Bjarne
cand.mag  ab-dot-noun ;       !
cand.scient	  ab-dot-noun ;   !
Chr		ab-dot ;              !Christian
d.g		  ab-dot ;
dhj	ab-dot ; !dahje
dieđ		  ab-noun ; ! 30 % dieđ without final dot.     !
dieđ.nr		  ab-noun ;            !
dipl.ing	  ab-dot-noun ;        !
dm:dm3			  ab-nodot-noun ;  !desimehtar
dr.art			  ab-dot-noun ;    !doktor artium
dr.theol		  ab-dot-noun ;    !
e.e			  ab-dot-adv ;                            !
ee			  ab-adv ;                                !
Ee		ab ;                  !erret eará
ex			  ab ;                                    !
fax    ab-dot-noun ;
fig			  ab-dot ;                                !
gen.lt		  ab-dot-noun ;                 !
H.K.H	ab-dot ;              !Hans/hennes kongelige høyhet
h.r.adv		  ab-dot ;                 !
inkl		  ab-dot ;                 !
isl		  ab-dot ;                     !
kapt		  ab-dot-noun ;            !
korpr		  ab-dot-noun ;                 !
ltn	  ab-dot-noun ;                         !
Luk		ab-noun ;             !Lukas
lul		  ab-dot ;                     !lullisámegiela, lulesamisk
merc		  ab-dot ;                 !
milj		  ab-dot-num ;             !
mrs		  ab-dot ;                     !
Mrs		ab-dot-noun ;         !
o.m.d	  ab-dot-adv ;                 !
Od.prop		ab-dot-noun ;          !Odeldikkeproposišuvdna
Od:Od3		ab-nodot-noun ;        !Odelstinget
odont		  ab-dot ;                 !
omd		  ab-dot-adv ;                 !
omd:omd3	  ab-nodot-adv ;           !
ossod.dir	  ab-dot-noun ;                 !ossodatdirektevra
Ot.prop		ab-noun ;              !
Ot.prp		ab-noun ;              !
Oth.prop	ab-noun ;              !h?
pharm	  ab-dot-adj ;                 !
pol		  ab-dot ;                     !
polit		  ab-dot-adj ;             !
priv		  ab-dot-adj ;             !
pro		  ab ;                         !
prop		  ab-dot-noun ;
psyk		  ab-dot-adj ;             !
r		  ab-dot-verb ;		   !riegadan
resipr	          ab-dot-adj ; !resiprohka TRAB or ITRAB?
Rom:Rom3	  ab-noun ;         !Girje romalaččaide
sos               ab-dot-adj ;				      !sosiálalaš
spes.ped	  ab-dot-noun ;                 !spesiála
suopm	 ab-dot-noun ;                 !
sásu	 ab-dot ;                      !
tel ab-noun ;	!Used also without dots
tri	ab-dot-noun ;                      !tohtori
vrd		  ab-dot-verb ;                !
vrd:vrd3	  ab-nodot-verb ; !veardit !
Vrd:Vrd3	ab-nodot ;        !
vs		  ab-dot-cc ;                  !
vsá		  ab-dot-noun ;                     !
čuo		ab ;                  !
B	ab-dot-noun ;
F	ab-dot-noun ;
K	ab-noun ;
L	ab-dot-noun ;
O	ab-noun ;
S	ab-noun ;
T	ab-dot-noun ;
Y	ab-dot-noun ;
Å	ab-dot-noun ;
Š	ab-dot-noun ;
